Louisiana, session 2026, HB1214.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 28:21, 25.1(B), 451.2(1) and (9)(introductory paragraph), 451.4, and
451.6(A) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§21. State psychiatric hospitals
A. For purposes of this Part, "state psychiatric hospital" refers to the hospital
at Jackson, known as the Eastern Louisiana Mental Health System, and the hospital
at Pineville, known as the Central Louisiana State Hospital, which are designated as
the hospitals for persons who have a mental illness or a substance-related or
addictive disorder until such time as separate or other hospitals are established. The
assistant secretary of the office of behavioral health of office of state health care
facilities within the department may reorganize and consolidate the administration
of the hospitals or facilities.
Page 1 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1214 ENROLLED
B. The assistant secretary of the office of behavioral health office of state
health care facilities of within the department may establish inpatient or residential
settings as independent or satellite facilities to these hospitals from funds presently
allocated or to be allocated to these hospitals by the legislature.
C. Any site designated under in accordance with this Section shall comply
with any applicable local and state building or zoning ordinances and laws.
D. Any site selected by the assistant secretary must be approved by the local
governing authority.
* * *
§25.1. Establishment of Feliciana Forensic Facility; authorization to establish
forensic facilities in New Orleans, Baton Rouge, Shreveport, and Alexandria
Alexandria, and surrounding areas
* * *
B. The department may establish additional forensic facilities for the
treatment of forensic patients in New Orleans, Baton Rouge, Shreveport, and
Alexandria Alexandria, and surrounding areas as funds are appropriated by the
legislature.
* * *
§451.2. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following words, terms, and phrases shall have
the meaning ascribed to them in this Section, except when the context clearly
indicates a different meaning:
(1) "Administrative units unit" means developmental centers and any other
a unit established under the administration and supervision of the office.
* * *
(9) "Developmental center" means an administrative unit of the office under
its administration, supervision, and control through which the office provides and
develops developmental disabilities services and system capacity building efforts a
state developmental facility operated and administered by the department through
its office of state health care facilities. The office of state health care facilities shall
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1214 ENROLLED
coordinate, as necessary, with the office for citizens with developmental disabilities
to provide and develop developmental disabilities services. Developmental centers
are responsible for: for planning and providing living options and other
developmental disabilities services.
* * *
§451.4. State developmental centers; office for citizens with developmental
disabilities of state health care facilities
A. The office of state health care facilities shall administer, supervise, and
be responsible for the operation of state developmental centers providing
developmental disabilities services.
B. Pinecrest Supports and Services Center is continued as an administrative
unit of this the office of state health care facilities.
C. Central Louisiana Supports and Services Center shall be an administrative
unit of this the office of state health care facilities.
D. The facility administrator of each center shall recommend to the
executive director of the office of state health care facilities and the secretary of the
Louisiana Department of Health policies and procedures necessary for the proper and
orderly operation of the facility. Such policies and procedures shall be consistent
with principles of this Chapter, office policies, and all applicable federal and state
laws and regulations. Policies and procedures developed pursuant to this Subsection
shall not be implemented until approved by the secretary.
* * *
§451.6. Assignment of property rights
A. By receiving services from and living in a licensed, state-operated,
twenty-four-hour residential facility provided by or through the office department,
the person shall be deemed to have made an assignment to the department of his
right, title, and interest in any property he owns, including interest in any trust or
succession, up to the cost of the services actually provided. The portion of property
and all assets which, pursuant to federal regulations or statute, the person may retain
and still maintain eligibility for coverage under in accordance with Title XIX of the
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1214 ENROLLED
Social Security Act programs or successor programs shall be exempt from such
assignment.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 36:251(C)(1), 253, 254(B)(1)(a)(i), 257(A) and (C), and 258(A), (D),
and (F) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 36:253.1, 258(N), and 258.1 are hereby
enacted to read as follows:
§251. Louisiana Department of Health; creation; domicile; composition; purpose
and functions
* * *
C.(1) The Louisiana Department of Health shall be composed of the
executive office of the secretary, the office of the surgeon general, the office of
management and finance, the office of public health, the office of behavioral health,
the office for citizens with developmental disabilities, the office of aging and adult
services, the office on women's health and community health, the office of state
health care facilities, and such other offices as shall be created by law.
* * *
§253. Secretary of health and hospitals the Louisiana Department of Health
There shall be a secretary of health and hospitals the Louisiana Department
of Health, who shall be appointed by the governor with consent of the Senate and
who shall serve at the pleasure of the governor at a salary fixed by the governor,
which salary shall not exceed the amount approved for such position by the
legislature while in session. The secretary shall serve as the executive head and chief
administrative officer of the Louisiana Department of Health and shall have the
responsibility for the policies of the department, except as otherwise provided by this
Title, and for the administration, control, and operation of the functions, programs,
and affairs of the department; provided that the secretary shall perform his functions
under the general control and supervision of the governor.
§253.1. Executive office of the secretary; duties and functions
A. The secretary shall directly supervise, direct, and control the executive
office of the secretary and the office of state health care facilities.
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1214 ENROLLED
B. The secretary shall determine the duties and functions of the executive
office of the secretary and the office of state health care facilities and shall control
and exercise all duties and functions.
§254. Powers and duties of the secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health
* * *
B. The secretary shall have authority to:
(1)(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided in R.S. 36:801 and 803:
(i) Employ, appoint, remove, assign, and promote such personnel as is
necessary for the efficient administration of the executive office of the secretary and
the office of state health care facilities and the performance of its their powers,
duties, functions, and responsibilities and such other personnel, who are not assigned
to an office, as may be necessary for the efficient administration of the department
and for the performance of the responsibilities, powers, duties, and functions of
agencies transferred to it.
* * *
§257. Assistant secretaries
A. Each office within the Louisiana Department of Health, except the
executive office of the secretary, the office of management and finance, the office
of state health care facilities, and the office of the surgeon general, shall be under the
immediate supervision and direction of an assistant secretary, who shall be appointed
by the governor with consent of the Senate. Each shall serve at the pleasure of the
governor and shall be paid a salary which shall be fixed by the governor, which
salary shall not exceed the amount approved for such position by the legislature
while in session.
* * *
C. Except as otherwise provided in R.S. 36:801, each assistant secretary shall
employ, appoint, remove, assign, and promote such personnel as is necessary for the
efficient administration of his office and its programs and the performance of its
powers, duties, functions, and responsibilities, in accordance with applicable civil
service laws, rules, and regulations, and with policies and rules of the department,
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1214 ENROLLED
all subject to budgetary control and applicable laws. In the event of an extended
absence or vacancy in the position of an assistant secretary, the secretary may act on
behalf or in lieu of the assistant secretary including as appointing authority for
personnel actions.
* * *
§258. Offices; purposes and functions
A. The purposes for which the offices, except for the executive office of the
secretary and the office of management and finance, of the Louisiana Department of
Health are created shall be set forth in this Section.
* * *
D. The office for citizens with developmental disabilities shall be responsible
for the programs and functions of the state relating to the care, training, treatment,
and education of persons with intellectual disabilities, persons with developmental
disabilities, and persons with autism. It shall administer coordinate as needed with
the office of state health care facilities regarding residential and day care facilities
of the state for persons with intellectual disabilities and persons with developmental
disabilities.
* * *
F. The office of aging and adult services shall be responsible for the
programs and functions of the Louisiana Department of Health related to the
long-term care of the elderly and the protection and long-term care of persons with
adult onset disabilities. It shall administer the residential state-operated nursing
homes, the Villa Feliciana Medical Complex, the protection services program of
adults from ages eighteen to fifty-nine, the department's long-term support and
services programs, the State Personal Assistance Services program, the Community
and Family Support Program, the Traumatic Brain and Spinal Cord Injury Trust
Fund, as well as other related programs within the department.
* * *
N. The office of state health care facilities shall be responsible for leading
and coordinating efforts with the Louisiana Department of Health to administer the
Page 6 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1214 ENROLLED
operation of state health care facilities provided for in R.S. 36:258.1. The office of
state health care facilities shall be responsible for compliance with state and federal
regulations and requirements for state health care facilities under its administration.
§258.1 Office of state health care facilities
A. The Louisiana Department of Health, office of state health care facilities
shall administer and coordinate all of the following facilities:
(1) The state psychiatric hospital in Jackson, Louisiana, known as Eastern
Louisiana Mental Health System, in accordance with R.S. 28:21.
(2) The state psychiatric hospital in Pineville, Louisiana, known as Central
Louisiana State Hospital, in accordance with R.S. 28:21.
(3) The state forensic hospital in Jackson, Louisiana, known as Feliciana
Forensic Facility, in accordance with R.S. 28:25.1.
(4) The geriatric hospital, including its skilled nursing facility unit, at
Jackson, Louisiana, known as Villa Feliciana Medical Complex, in accordance with
R.S. 28:22.7.
(5) The state developmental center for persons with developmental
disabilities, known as Pinecrest Supports and Services Center, accordance with R.S.
28:22.8.
(6) The state developmental center for persons with developmental
disabilities, known as Central Louisiana Supports and Services Center, in accordance
with R.S. 28:22.8.
(7) Any other licensed state health care facility upon appropriation by the
legislature.
B. The department shall employ an executive director of the office of state
health care facilities who shall report directly to the secretary.
C. Each administrator or chief executive officer of a facility provided for in
Subsection A of this Section shall report directly to the executive director of the
office of state health care facilities.
D. The office of state health care facilities may obtain licensure and
certification for and may operate such other state health care facilities as funds for
Page 7 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1214 ENROLLED
such are appropriated by the legislature. State health care facilities may include
inpatient, residential, outpatient, and day programs.
Section 3. R.S. 40:16.1 (Section Heading) is hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§16.1. Proceeds of any sale of the state facilities owned by the Louisiana
Department of Health, office of behavioral health
* * *
Section 4. R.S. 28:22.8(A)(2) and (3) and 451.2(9)(a) and (b) are hereby repealed
in their entirety.
Section 5. The Louisiana Department of Health is authorized to transfer funding and
positions within the department to establish and implement the office of state health care
facilities.
Section 6. The provisions of R.S. 36:258(F) as amended and reenacted by Section
3 of this Act shall supersede the provisions for R.S. 36:258(F) as amended and reenacted by
Section 3 of Act No. 384 of the 2013 Regular Session of the Legislature when Section 1 of
Act No. 384 of the 2013 Regular Session of the Legislature becomes effective.
Section 7. This Act shall become effective on October 1, 2026.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 8 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.